Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska12-1114
Pre-need seller; trust funds; retain cost-of-living amount.

To offset increases in the cost of living as the same may affect the trust accounts, the pre-need seller shall compute each year the total amount of the trust principal of each trust account determined as of December 31 of the immediately preceding year, and then multiply such amount by the percentage increase in the National Consumer Price Index for such year. The amount so determined shall be the amount of the current year's income that is required to be retained in trust by the trustee before the balance of the income for the current year can be paid out to the pre-need seller as provided in subsection (1) of section 12-1113. If publication of the National Consumer Price Index is discontinued, the director shall select a comparable index for the purposes of determining such percentage increase in the cost of living and notify all licensed pre-need sellers of the index selected.

Laws 1986, LB 643, § 14.